Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-2149
Prohibited acts; penalty.

Any person who willfully interferes with or obstructs any employee of the metropolitan utilities district in the discharge of his or her duties, who willfully tampers with or injures such water or natural gas facilities or the pipes, apparatus, or any service connected therewith, or who changes or alters the plumbing or connection between the water or gas meter and service main affording the water or natural gas supply without securing a permit as required by the rules and regulations of the board of directors shall be deemed guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1913, c. 143, § 12, p. 355;

R.S.1913, § 4254;

C.S.1922, § 3757;

C.S.1929, § 14-1013;

R.S.1943, § 14-1019;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 14-1019;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 49.